Connecticut, session 2026, HB05384.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 5-192f of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (d) "Hazardous duty member" means a member who is a state
5 policeman in the active service of the Division of State Police within the
6 Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, who is
7 engaged in guard or instructional duties at the Connecticut Correctional
8 Institution, Somers, the Connecticut Correctional Institution, Enfield-
9 Medium, the Carl Robinson Correctional Institution, Enfield, the John
10 R. Manson Youth Institution, Cheshire, the York Correctional
11 Institution, the Connecticut Correctional Center, Cheshire or the
12 community correctional centers, who is an employee of the Whiting
13 Forensic Hospital or its predecessor institutions with direct and
14 substantial patient contact, who is a detective, chief inspector, [or]
15 inspector or investigator in the Division of Criminal Justice or chief
HB5384 / File No. 247 1

HB5384 File No. 247
16 detective, who is employed as a correctional counselor, correctional
17 counselor supervisor, parole officer or parole supervisor or in a
18 comparable job classification by the Board of Pardons and Paroles, [or]
19 who has been designated as a hazardous duty member pursuant to the
20 terms of a collective bargaining agreement, who is an investigator in the
21 Division of Public Defender Services, or who is a support service
22 investigator in Support Enforcement Services of the Superior Court.
23 Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 5-192n of the general statutes is
24 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
25 1, 2026):
26 (a) Each "hazardous duty member" who has completed twenty-five
27 years of credited service while a hazardous duty member may be retired
28 on his own application on the first day of any future month named in
29 the application. For this purpose, leaves of absence, military service, and
30 any other period of nonstate employment which is included as credited
31 service shall be deemed credited service while a hazardous duty
32 member only if state employment as a hazardous duty member
33 immediately precedes and immediately succeeds such period of
34 nonstate employment. For a hazardous duty member who is (1) an
35 investigator in the Division of Criminal Justice, (2) an investigator in the
36 Division of Public Defender Services, or (3) a support service
37 investigator in Support Enforcement Services of the Superior Court,
38 credited service while a hazardous duty member shall be calculated
39 from October 1, 2026.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 5-192f(d)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 5-192n(a)
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5384 / File No. 247 2

HB5384 File No. 247
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost 581,000 775,000
Benefits
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill allows certain investigators to earn credit towards a
hazardous duty pension in the State Employees Retirement System
(SERS), resulting in a cost differential of approximately $581,000 in FY
27, annualized to $775,000 in FY 28 for the transition from regular SERS
to hazardous duty.1 The total annual state cost for the investigators'
hazardous duty pensions is approximately $1.2 million, compared to the
approximate cost of $456,00 for their regular pensions for the same year.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
1 Estimates are based on current salary information and pension rates for 110 eligible
employees.
HB5384 / File No. 247 3

HB5384 File No. 247
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5384
AN ACT CONCERNING HAZARD PENSIONS FOR CERTAIN
JUDICIAL EMPLOYEES.